Utah statutes.
9-1-201.1.   Executive director of department -- Appointment -- Removal -- Compensation.

(1)  The department shall be directed, organized, and managed by an executive director appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.

(2)  The executive director serves at the pleasure of the governor.

(3)  The salary of the executive director shall be established by the governor within the salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation.

